North Carolina, session 2025, SB142.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Mecklenburg Council of Elders,
Inc., a nonprofit organization, to support the organization in providing services to residents of
Mecklenburg County through seminars and events designed to raise awareness of their rights and
options as citizens regardless of their past involvement with the law and to assist with their
Juvenile Court Intervention program.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S142-v-1*